Arkansas, session 2025, HB1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas Tech University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, Arkansas Tech University 1 $354,537
(2) Executive Vice President and Prov. 1 $268,500
(3) Vice Pres. for Admin. & Finance 1 $225,262
(4) Vice Pres. for Government Relations 1 $221,841
*HAR033*
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(5) Vice President for Development 1 $221,840
(6) Vice Pres. for Student Affairs 1 $221,840
(7) Vice President 1 $221,840
(8) Dean of College 8 $214,999
(9) Project/Program Administrator 43
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(10) IT Pool 56
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(11) Associate Vice President 5 $194,960
(12) Assoc. Vice Pres. of Academic Affairs 1 $194,960
(13) Assoc. Vice Pres. of Fiscal Affairs 1 $194,960
(14) Executive Assistant to the President 1 $194,960
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(15) Associate Dean of College 6 $189,516
(16) Exec. Dir. for Advancement Services 1 $189,516
(17) Director of Information Systems 1 $188,816
(18) General Counsel 1 $174,598
(19) Controller 1 $173,914
(20) Dir. of Physical Plant/Plant Engineer 1 $163,703
(21) Director of University Relations 1 $163,388
(22) Registrar 1 $156,464
(23) Director of Student Success Center 1 $154,831
(24) Director of Planned Giving 1 $154,802
(25) Dean of Students 1 $146,665
(26) Director of Enrollment Management 1 $146,665
(27) Director of Online Partnerships 1 $146,665
(28) Coordinator of Off-Campus Courses 1 $146,665
(29) Assoc. Dir. of Information Systems 2 $144,564
(30) Director of Institutional Research 1 $142,085
(31) Instructional Designer 2 $140,416
(32) English Language Institute Coord. 1 $138,840
(33) Director of Distance Learning Serv. 1 $138,524
(34) Development/Advancement Admin. 5
Development/Advancement Director $135,747
Development/Advancement Manager $123,019
Development/Advancement Specialist $106,139
(35) Director of Admissions 1 $135,442
(36) Director of Alumni Svcs. & Annual Giv. 1 $135,442
(37) Director of International Programs 1 $135,442
(38) Dir. of Prof. Development Institute 1 $135,442
(39) Director of Public Affairs 1 $135,442
(40) Director of Student Aid 1 $135,442
(41) Associate Controller 1 $132,371
(42) Assoc. Dean of Employ. & Career Svc. 1 $132,371
(43) Business Manager 1 $132,371
(44) Dir. of Grants and Other Spons. Prog. 1 $132,371
(45) Treasurer 1 $132,371
(46) Associate Dean of Students 6 $131,622
(47) Associate Director of Admissions 4 $131,622
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(48) Associate Registrar 2 $131,622
(49) Director of Public Safety 1 $128,295
(50) Construction Manager 1 $127,980
(51) Academic/Student Support Counselor 11 $127,506
(52) Director of Budget 1 $126,224
(53) Director of Testing 1 $119,695
(54) Endowment Financial Analyst 1 $118,438
(55) Dir. of Corp. and Foundation Giving 1 $117,402
(56) Dir. of Donor Relations & Devel. Svcs. 1 $117,402
(57) Special Projects Coordinator 17 $116,723
(58) Director of Placement/Career Service 1 $115,292
(59) Dir. of Pub. & Creative Svcs. 1 $113,108
(60) Director of Student Activities 1 $109,445
(61) Assistant Dir. of Information Systems 1 $106,742
(62) Dir. of Academic Technology & Comp. 1 $106,742
(63) Dir. of Recruitment & Orientation 1 $106,742
(64) Assistant Dean of Students 7 $106,608
(65) Coordinator of Grants Management 1 $106,608
(66) Dir. of Acad. Advisement and Retention 1 $106,608
(67) Director of Academic Services 1 $106,608
(68) Student Development Specialist 18 $106,608
(69) Director of Disability Services 1 $106,607
(70) Institutional Research Associate 2 $106,607
(71) Asst. Dir. of International Programs 1 $106,607
(72) Internal Auditor 1 $103,601
(73) Coordinator of Intramural Activities 1 $103,400
(74) Coord. Affirm. Action/Disability Svc. 1 $102,145
(75) Dir. of Learning Resource Center 2 $100,339
(76) Associate Director of Student Aid 1 $97,664
(77) Fiscal Support Pool 20
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(78) Public Safety Pool 26
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(79) Institutional Assistant 5 $88,389
(80) Academic Advisor 14 $85,246
(81) Financial Analyst II 1 $85,136
(82) Procurement Manager 1 $85,136
(83) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 2 $78,713
(84) Development Specialist 1 $78,713
(85) Education Counselor 1 $78,713
(86) Grants Coordinator 1 $78,713
(87) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(88) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(89) Assistant Personnel Manager 1 $75,685
(90) Career Plan & Placement Coordinator 1 $75,685
(91) Executive Assistant to Director 1 $75,685
(92) Financial Analyst I 2 $75,685
(93) Skilled Trades Pool 21
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(94) Broadcast Promotion Specialist 1 $72,774
(95) Human Resource Analyst 1 $72,774
(96) Legal Services Specialist 1 $72,774
(97) Maintenance Coordinator 2 $72,774
(98) Buyer 3 $69,975
(99) HEI Program Coordinator 1 $69,975
(100) Occupational Safety Coordinator 1 $69,975
(101) Administrative Support Pool 84
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(102) Assistant Registrar 6 $67,284
(103) Financial Aid Analyst 6 $67,284
(104) HR Program Representative 1 $67,284
(105) Library Support Pool 5
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(106) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
(107) Student Accounts Officer 1 $67,284
(108) ATU Coliseum Manager 1 $64,696
(109) Broadcast Production Specialist 1 $64,696
(110) Career Plan & Placement Specialist 1 $64,696
(111) Warehouse Manager 1 $64,696
(112) Collection Officer 1 $62,208
(113) Financial Aid Specialist 2 $62,208
(114) Human Resources Specialist 3 $62,208
(115) Landscape Supervisor 2 $62,208
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(116) Licensed Practical Nurse 1 $62,208
(117) Records Management Analyst 1 $62,208
(118) Farm Foreman - Inst. 1 $59,815
(119) Maintenance Specialist 1 $59,815
(120) Coordinator of Housekeeping 1 $57,515
(121) Call Center Specialist 3 $56,353
(122) Admissions Analyst Supervisor 1 $55,302
(123) Collector 1 $55,302
(124) Equipment Mechanic 2 $55,302
(125) Human Resources Assistant 1 $55,302
(126) Landscape Specialist 3 $55,302
(127) Special Events Supervisor 3 $55,302
(128) Heavy Equipment Operator 1 $53,175
(129) Maintenance Assistant 10 $51,130
(130) Registrar's Assistant 4 $49,164
(131) Equipment Operator 2 $45,455
(132) Institutional Services Supervisor 2 $43,706
(133) Institutional Services Assistant 40 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(134) Department Chairperson 18 $201,304
(135) Director of Library 1 $191,606
(136) Dir. of Assess. & Inst. Effectiveness 1 $172,983
(137) Director of the STEM Institute 1 $140,415
(138) Librarian Pool 7
Librarian $132,578
Associate Librarian $112,217
Assistant Librarian $106,436
(139) Instructor 1 $128,780
(140) Assessment Specialist 1 $94,426
(141) Research Assistant 2 $87,721
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(142) Faculty 300
Distinguished Professor $221,655
Professor $194,459
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Assoc. Professor $170,492
Asst. Professor $142,719
Instructor $111,361
Lecturer $89,979
(143) Part-Time Faculty 200 $56,046
(144) Graduate Assistant 175 $35,147
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(145) Athletic Director 1 $159,847
(146) Head Coach 10 $146,047
(147) Director of Health Services 1 $135,998
(148) Advance Practice Nurse 1 $127,234
(149) Business Manager 1 $126,292
(150) Asst. Athletic Director 1 $122,713
(151) Athletic Compliance Officer 1 $118,867
(152) Director of Residence Life 2 $115,924
(153) Asst. Coach 14 $114,807
(154) Athletic Academic Director 1 $114,807
(155) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $114,807
(156) Registered Nurse Practitioner 1 $110,699
(157) Assistant Sports Information Dir. 1 $107,534
(158) Athletic Facility Manager 1 $96,579
(159) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(160) Registered Nurse 2 $81,860
(161) Skilled Trades Pool 3
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(162) Assistant Athletic Trainer 3 $74,057
(163) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(164) Production Artist 1 $72,774
(165) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(166) Special Events Manager 1 $67,284
(167) Maintenance Specialist 2 $59,815
(168) Campus Postmaster 1 $55,302
(169) Maintenance Assistant 3 $51,130
(170) Special Events Worker 1 $47,272
(171) Shipping and Receiving Clerk 1 $45,455
(172) Stadium Maintenance Supervisor 1 $45,455
(173) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
(174) Institutional Services Assistant 12 $42,025
ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY - OZARK CAMPUS
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(175) Chancellor, ATU - Ozark Campus 1 $208,138
(176) Project/Program Administrator 4
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(177) IT Pool 2
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(178) V-C for Res., Innovation & Econ. Devel. 1 $188,485
(179) Vice Chancellor 1 $167,057
(180) Vice Chancellor of Admin. and Finance 1 $156,658
(181) Vice Chancellor of Student Services 1 $156,658
(182) Director of Computer Services 1 $119,881
(183) Associate Director of Financial Aid 1 $118,772
(184) Special Projects Coordinator 1 $116,722
(185) Associate Registrar 1 $113,318
(186) Associate Director of Computer Serv. 1 $106,741
(187) Coordinator of Student Recruitment 2 $106,741
(188) Associate Director of Admissions 1 $106,741
(189) Career Advisor 1 $106,608
(190) Student Development Specialist 1 $106,607
(191) Academic Counselor 1 $99,709
(192) Fiscal Support Pool 2
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(193) Assessment Coordinator 1 $86,850
(194) Assistant Director of Academic Serv. 1 $86,850
(195) Academic Advisor 2 $83,172
(196) Director of Community Outreach 1 $81,473
(197) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 1 $78,713
(198) Administrative Support Pool 14
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(199) Library Support Pool 1
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(200) Maintenance Supervisor 1 $67,284
(201) Maintenance Technician 1 $62,208
(202) Maintenance Specialist 8 $59,815
(203) Human Resources Assistant 1 $55,302
(204) Industry Training Specialist 5 $53,042
(205) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(206) Librarian 1 $132,579
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(207) Division Chair 3 $109,317
(208) 12-Month Workforce Ed. Faculty 9 $108,309
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(209) Workforce Ed. Faculty 62 $106,394
(210) Workforce Ed. Part-Time Faculty 68 $33,025
ARKANSAS TECH INSTITUTE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(211) Project/Program Administrator 1
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(212) IT Pool 2
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(213) Business Manager 1 $132,371
(214) Dir. of Business & Industrial Training 1 $118,771
(215) Director of Placement/Career Service 1 $115,292
(216) Career Advisor 10 $106,608
(217) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(218) Institutional Services Assistant 1 $42,025
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,561

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Tech University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
thousand six hundred fifteen (1,615) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Tech University, to be payable from the
Arkansas Tech University Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Arkansas Tech University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $30,277,540
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,809,185
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,476,319
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,834,917
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 336,412
(06) CONTINGENCY 1,921,296
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $41,655,669

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS TECH INSTITUTE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Tech University, to be payable
from the Arkansas Tech University Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Arkansas Tech Institute for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $923,360
(02) EXTRA HELP 44,444
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 335,965
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 701,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,004,769

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Tech University, to be payable from cash funds as defined by
Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Arkansas Tech University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $31,485,281
(02) EXTRA HELP 7,875,000
(03) OVERTIME 262,500
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,379,484
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 36,750,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,260,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,250,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 16,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 54,722,093
(07) DEBT SERVICE 10,500,000
(08) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 315,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $178,799,358

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033

HB1261
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.























01/27/2025 2:19:27 PM HAR033